test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_C_zhiishiib_gt-norm.yaml
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gizhiishiibensishinaanidig, gizhiishiibensishinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gizhiishiibensishiwaabaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gizhiishiibensishiwaabaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gizhiishiibensishiwaabaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gizhiishiibensishiwaadig, gizhiishiibensishiwaadog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gizhiishiibensishiwaadig, gizhiishiibensishiwaadog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gizhiishiibensishiwaadig, gizhiishiibensishiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: ozhiishiibenyishiniibaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: ozhiishiibenyishiniibaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: ozhiishiibenyishiniibaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [ozhiishiibenyishiniidig, ozhiishiibenyishiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [ozhiishiibenyishiniidig, ozhiishiibenyishiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [ozhiishiibenyishiniidig, ozhiishiibenyishiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: ozhiishiibenyishiwaabaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: ozhiishiibenyishiwaabaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: ozhiishiibenyishiwaabaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ozhiishiibenyishiwaadig, ozhiishiibenyishiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ozhiishiibenyishiwaadig, ozhiishiibenyishiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ozhiishiibenyishiwaadig, ozhiishiibenyishiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: ozhiishiibensishiniibaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: ozhiishiibensishiniibaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: ozhiishiibensishiniibaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [ozhiishiibensishiniidig, ozhiishiibensishiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [ozhiishiibensishiniidig, ozhiishiibensishiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [ozhiishiibensishiniidig, ozhiishiibensishiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: ozhiishiibensishiwaabaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: ozhiishiibensishiwaabaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: ozhiishiibensishiwaabaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ozhiishiibensishiwaadig, ozhiishiibensishiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ozhiishiibensishiwaadig, ozhiishiibensishiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ozhiishiibensishiwaadig, ozhiishiibensishiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nizhiishiibimishinaanibaniing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nizhiishiibimishinaanibaniin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nizhiishiibimishinaanibaniig
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nizhiishiibimishinaanidig, nizhiishiibimishinaanidog]
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nizhiishiibimishinaanidig, nizhiishiibimishinaanidog]
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nizhiishiibimishinaanidig, nizhiishiibimishinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: gizhiishiibimishinaanibaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: gizhiishiibimishinaanibaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: gizhiishiibimishinaanibaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [gizhiishiibimishinaanidig, gizhiishiibimishinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gizhiishiibimishinaanidig, gizhiishiibimishinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gizhiishiibimishinaanidig, gizhiishiibimishinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gizhiishiibimishiwaabaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gizhiishiibimishiwaabaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gizhiishiibimishiwaabaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gizhiishiibimishiwaadig, gizhiishiibimishiwaadog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gizhiishiibimishiwaadig, gizhiishiibimishiwaadog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gizhiishiibimishiwaadig, gizhiishiibimishiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: ozhiishiibimishiniibaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: ozhiishiibimishiniibaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: ozhiishiibimishiniibaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [ozhiishiibimishiniidig, ozhiishiibimishiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [ozhiishiibimishiniidig, ozhiishiibimishiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [ozhiishiibimishiniidig, ozhiishiibimishiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: ozhiishiibimishiwaabaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: ozhiishiibimishiwaabaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: ozhiishiibimishiwaabaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ozhiishiibimishiwaadig, ozhiishiibimishiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ozhiishiibimishiwaadig, ozhiishiibimishiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ozhiishiibimishiwaadig, ozhiishiibimishiwaadog]
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nizhiishiibenyimishinaanibaniing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nizhiishiibenyimishinaanibaniin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nizhiishiibenyimishinaanibaniig
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nizhiishiibenyimishinaanidig, nizhiishiibenyimishinaanidog]
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nizhiishiibenyimishinaanidig, nizhiishiibenyimishinaanidog]
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nizhiishiibenyimishinaanidig, nizhiishiibenyimishinaanidog]
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nizhiishiibensimishinaanibaniing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nizhiishiibensimishinaanibaniin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nizhiishiibensimishinaanibaniig
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nizhiishiibensimishinaanidig, nizhiishiibensimishinaanidog]
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nizhiishiibensimishinaanidig, nizhiishiibensimishinaanidog]
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nizhiishiibensimishinaanidig, nizhiishiibensimishinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: gizhiishiibenyimishinaanibaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: gizhiishiibenyimishinaanibaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: gizhiishiibenyimishinaanibaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [gizhiishiibenyimishinaanidig, gizhiishiibenyimishinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gizhiishiibenyimishinaanidig, gizhiishiibenyimishinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gizhiishiibenyimishinaanidig, gizhiishiibenyimishinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gizhiishiibenyimishiwaabaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gizhiishiibenyimishiwaabaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gizhiishiibenyimishiwaabaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gizhiishiibenyimishiwaadig, gizhiishiibenyimishiwaadog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gizhiishiibenyimishiwaadig, gizhiishiibenyimishiwaadog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gizhiishiibenyimishiwaadig, gizhiishiibenyimishiwaadog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: gizhiishiibensimishinaanibaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: gizhiishiibensimishinaanibaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: gizhiishiibensimishinaanibaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [gizhiishiibensimishinaanidig, gizhiishiibensimishinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gizhiishiibensimishinaanidig, gizhiishiibensimishinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gizhiishiibensimishinaanidig, gizhiishiibensimishinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gizhiishiibensimishiwaabaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gizhiishiibensimishiwaabaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gizhiishiibensimishiwaabaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gizhiishiibensimishiwaadig, gizhiishiibensimishiwaadog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gizhiishiibensimishiwaadig, gizhiishiibensimishiwaadog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gizhiishiibensimishiwaadig, gizhiishiibensimishiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: ozhiishiibenyimishiniibaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: ozhiishiibenyimishiniibaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: ozhiishiibenyimishiniibaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [ozhiishiibenyimishiniidig, ozhiishiibenyimishiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [ozhiishiibenyimishiniidig, ozhiishiibenyimishiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [ozhiishiibenyimishiniidig, ozhiishiibenyimishiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: ozhiishiibenyimishiwaabaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: ozhiishiibenyimishiwaabaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: ozhiishiibenyimishiwaabaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ozhiishiibenyimishiwaadig, ozhiishiibenyimishiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ozhiishiibenyimishiwaadig, ozhiishiibenyimishiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ozhiishiibenyimishiwaadig, ozhiishiibenyimishiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: ozhiishiibensimishiniibaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: ozhiishiibensimishiniibaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: ozhiishiibensimishiniibaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [ozhiishiibensimishiniidig, ozhiishiibensimishiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [ozhiishiibensimishiniidig, ozhiishiibensimishiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [ozhiishiibensimishiniidig, ozhiishiibensimishiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: ozhiishiibensimishiwaabaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: ozhiishiibensimishiwaabaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: ozhiishiibensimishiwaabaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ozhiishiibensimishiwaadig, ozhiishiibensimishiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ozhiishiibensimishiwaadig, ozhiishiibensimishiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ozhiishiibensimishiwaadig, ozhiishiibensimishiwaadog]
     
